District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.171

Scope of practice for real estate salespersons.

For the purposes of this part, the term “real estate salesperson” means any person employed by a licensed real estate broker to manage or lease; rent or offer to lease or rent; list for sale, sell, or offer for sale; buy or offer to buy; negotiate the purchase or sale, or exchange of real estate; or to negotiate a loan on real estate.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.171.